Hawaii statutes.
§312-5 Annual report to the governor.
Annually during the month of July but as of June 30 preceding, the state
librarian shall report to the governor the moneys received from all sources and
expended for all purposes during the preceding year, and any other matters
pertaining to the libraries which it may deem important, or the governor may
require. [L 1909, c 83, §5; RL 1925, §420; RL 1935, §803; am L 1937, c 33, §1;
RL 1945, §1914; RL 1955, §45-4; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §18; HRS §312-5; am L
1981, c 150, §10; am L 2015, c 26, §7]

Cross References

Annual reports, see §93-12.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next